North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 4. Other Remedies.

§ 55-13-40.
Other remedies limited.

The legality of a proposed or completed corporate action described in

G.S. 55-13-02(a)

may not be contested, nor may the corporate action be enjoined, set aside, or rescinded, in a legal or equitable proceeding by a shareholder after the shareholders have approved the corporate action.

Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to a corporate action that:

Was not authorized and approved in accordance with the applicable provisions of any of the following:

Article 9, 9A, 10, 11, 11A, or 12 of this Chapter.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws.

The resolution of the board of directors authorizing the corporate action.

Was procured as a result of fraud, a material misrepresentation, or an omission of a material fact necessary to make statements made, in light of the circumstances in which they were made, not misleading.

Constitutes an interested transaction, unless it has been authorized, approved, or ratified by either (i) the board of directors or a committee of the board or (ii) the shareholders, in the same manner as is provided in G.S. 55-8-31(a)(1) and (c) or in G.S. 55-8-31(a)(2) and (d), as if the interested transaction were a director’s conflict of interest transaction.

Was approved by less than unanimous consent of the voting shareholders pursuant to

G.S. 55-7-04

, provided that both of the following are true:

The challenge to the corporate action is brought by a shareholder who did not consent and as to whom notice of the approval of the corporate action was not effective at least 10 days before the corporate action was effected.

The proceeding challenging the corporate action is commenced within 10 days after notice of the approval of the corporate action is effective as to the shareholder bringing the proceeding.

History.

2011-347, s. 1.